es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Movilidad y accesibilidad > Equipo de accesibilidad: Scooters eléctricos; Accesorios para elevador de escaleras; Salvaescaleras; Sábanas y tablas de traslado; Sillas de ruedas
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Mobilidade e acessibilidade > Equipamento de acessibilidade: Scooters elétricos; Acessórios para elevador de escadas; Cadeiras elevadoras; Placas e lençóis para transferência de pacientes; Cadeiras de rodas
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 无障碍与移动辅助用品 > 无障碍设备: 代步车; 楼梯升降机配件; 楼梯升降椅; 辅助转移板/移位板; 轮椅
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Liikkuminen ja esteettömyys > Liikkumisen apuvälineet: Mopedit; Porrasnousintarvike; Porrasnostimet; Siirtolevyt ja -lakanat; Pyörätuolit
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Mobilitate și accesibilitate > Echipamente de accesibilitate: Scutere pentru mobilitate; Accesorii pentru scările electrice; Lifturi pentru scări; Scânduri și plăci pentru transfer; Scaune cu rotile
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Мобилност и помощни средства > Помощни средства: Мобилни скутери; Аксесоари за стълбищен асансьор; Асансьори за стълбища; Дъски и подложки за преместване на хора; Инвалидни колички
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Rörlighet och tillgänglighet > Hjälpmedel för tillgänglighet: Permobiler; Trapphisstillbehör; Trapphissar; Förflyttningsbrädor och -lakan; Rullstolar
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Artykuły dla osób mających trudności z poruszaniem się > Sprzęt ułatwiający poruszanie się: Skutery inwalidzkie; Akcesoria do wind schodowych; Platformy przyschodowe; Deski transferowe i maty do przenoszenia; Wózki inwalidzkie
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Mobilnost in dostopnost > Oprema za osebe s posebnimi potrebami: Invalidski skuterji; Dodatki za dvigala za stopnice; Stopniščna dvigala; Plošče in podloge za premeščanje; Invalidski vozički
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Mobilitet og tilgjengelighet > Tilgjengelighetsutstyr: Mobilitetsscootere; Trappeheis tilbehør; Trappeheiser; Overføringsbrett og -lakner; Rullestoler
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Mobilité et accessibilité > Matériel d’accessibilité: Scooters de mobilité; Accessoires pour monte-escaliers; Monte-escaliers; Planches et alèses de transfert; Fauteuils roulants
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Κινητικότητα & προσβασιμότητα > Εξοπλισμός προσβασιμότητας: Σκούτερ κινητικότητας; Αξεσουάρ ανελκυστήρα σκάλας; Κεκλιμένοι ανελκυστήρες; Πίνακες & σεντόνια μεταφοράς; Αναπηρικά αμαξίδια
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Mobiliteit en toegankelijkheid > Toegankelijkheidsapparatuur: Scootmobielen; Traplift accessoires; Trapliften; Draagbaren; Rolstoelen
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Bevægelighed og mobilitet > Mobilitetsudstyr: El-scootere; Trappelifttilbehør; Trappelifte; Flyttebrætter og glidepuder; Kørestole
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 移動補助具・生活補助具 > 生活補助具: 電動カート; 階段昇降機用アクセサリー; 階段リフト; トランスファーボード・シート; 車椅子
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Mobilità e accessibilità > Ausili accessibilità: Scooter per anziani e disabili; Accessori del montascale; Montascale; Tavole e teli di trasferimento; Sedie a rotelle
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 이동/사용 편의 > 사용 편의 장비: 전동 스쿠터; 계단 리프트 액세서리; 계단 승강기; 이동용 보드/시트; 휠체어
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Mobilidade e acessibilidade > Equipamento de acessibilidade: Scooters de mobilidade; Acessórios para elevadores de escadas; Elevadores de escadas; Resguardos e tábuas de transferência; Cadeiras de rodas
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > Mobilite ve Kolay Erişim > Erişim Ekipmanları: Akülü Engelli Araçları; Merdiven Asansörü Aksesuarları; Merdiven Asansörleri; Nakil Tahtaları ve Çarşafları; Tekerlekli Sandalyeler
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > การเคลื่อนไหวและการเข้าถึง > เครื่องมือสำหรับการเข้าถึงพิเศษ: สกูตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า; อุปกรณ์เสริมลิฟต์บันได; เก้าอี้เลื่อนขึ้นบันได; บอร์ดและแผ่นสำหรับเคลื่อนย้าย; รถเข็นวีลแชร์
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Mobilitás és hozzáférhetőség > Kisegítő berendezések: Mozgássegítő robogók; Lépcső-liftkiegészítők; Lépcsőliftek; Átviteli táblák és lapok; Kerekesszékek
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Omezená pohyblivost a bezbariérový přístup > Pomůcky pro invalidy: Skútry; Příslušenství ke schodišťovým plošinám; Výtahy na schody; Přesouvací podložky; Invalidní vozíky
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Mobilita a dostupnosť > Vybavenie pre bezbariérový prístup: Invalidné skútre; Príslušenstvo pre schodiskové výťahy; Schodiskové výťahy; Prenosné dosky a podložky; Invalidné vozíky
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Mobility & Accessibility > Accessibility Equipment: Mobility Scooters; Stair Lift Accessories; Stair Lifts; Transfer Boards & Sheets; Wheelchairs
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Sản phẩm hỗ trợ khả năng di chuyển và tiếp cận > Thiết bị hỗ trợ khả năng tiếp cận: Xe điện 3 bánh, 4 bánh; Phụ kiện ghế nâng cầu thang; Ghế cầu thang; Cáng hoặc vải khiêng; Xe lăn
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Senioren- & Behindertenbedarf > Zubehör & Bedarf zur Barrierefreiheit: Elektromobile; Treppenlift-Zubehör; Treppenlifte; Umlagerungsbretter & -tücher; Rollstühle
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 無障礙行動力 > 無障礙設施: 電動車; 樓梯升降機配件; 樓梯升降機; 移位滑墊/滑板; 輪椅
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Mobilumas ir pritaikymas neįgaliesiems > Pritaikymo neįgaliesiems įranga: Motoroleriai neįgaliesiems; Laiptų keltuvo priedai; Laiptų keltuvai; Perkėlimo plokštės ir lakštai; Neįgaliųjų vežimėliai
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Mobilnost i pristupačnost > Oprema za pristupačnost: Skuter za mobilnost; Dodatna oprema za stubišna dizala; Dizala za stepenice; Daske i prostirke za pomicanje; Invalidska kolica
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Обеспечения мобильности людей > Оборудование для маломобильных людей: Скутеры для маломобильных людей; Аксессуары для лестничных подъемников; Лестничные подъемники; Доски для пересаживания и простыни для перемещения; Инвалидные коляски